Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-122
Nebraska State Historical Society; Highway Historical Markers; damaged or destroyed; replacement.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be empowered to use any legal means necessary to secure payment to the state for the actual replacement cost of any markers damaged or destroyed, accidentally or otherwise. Any fund so collected shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the appropriate fund for the procurement of historical markers and may be expended as provided for by law.

Laws 1957, c. 384, § 4, p. 1340;

Laws 1959, c. 441, § 5, p. 1484;

R.R.S.1943, § 82-204;

Laws 1969, c. 811, § 4, p. 3049.